North Carolina statutes. Chapter 35. Sterilization Procedures.
Article 7. Sterilization of Persons Mentally Ill and Mentally Retarded. [Repealed]

§§ 35-36 through 35-50.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2003, c. 13, s. 1, effective April 17, 2003.

Cross References.

As to present similar provision pertaining to procedure for sterilization of mentally ill or mentally retarded in case of medical necessity, see

G.S. 35A-1245

.

§§ 35-51 through 35-57.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 1281.